Hawaii statutes.
[§236D-4.5] Nonresidents not
citizens; tax imposed; exemption. (a) A tax in an amount computed as
provided in this section is imposed on the noncitizen transfer of the taxable
estate located in Hawaii of every nonresident decedent who was not a citizen at
the time of their death.

(b) The tax shall be computed by
multiplying the federal credit by a fraction, the numerator of which is the
value of the property with a situs in Hawaii, and the denominator of which is
the value of the decedent's gross estate.

(c) The noncitizen transfer of
the property of a nonresident not a citizen is exempt from the tax imposed by
this section to the extent that the property of residents is exempt from
taxation under the laws of the state in which the nonresident not a citizen is
domiciled; except that the following shall be subject to tax under this
section:

(1) Real property having an actual situs in this State,
whether or not held in a trust the corpus of which is included in a decedent's
gross estate for federal estate tax purposes;

(2) A beneficial interest in a land trust that owns
real property located in the State; and

(3) Tangible and intangible personal property having
a situs in this State.

(d) "Situs" as used in
this section means the location of a decedent's property within the meaning of section
2104 of the Internal Revenue Code, including regulations and other guidance
issued thereunder, substituting "Hawaii" for "the United States".
[L 2010, c 74, pt of §1]

Note

Section applies to property interests
of persons who die after April 30, 2010. L 2010, c 74, §5.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next